Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,228
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Small Business Stabilization Grant Program Act is to provide grant funds to eligible businesses that are experiencing a significant loss of revenue as a result of a qualifying event.

Laws 2022, LB598, § 2.
April 20, 2022